Mississippi statutes. Title 13. Evidence, Process and Juries
Evidence of Child Abuse

§ 13-1-401.
Applicability of special evidentiary provisions.

The rules of evidence prescribed in Sections 13-1-401 through 13-1-415 shall be applicable in any youth court proceeding and in any criminal prosecution under the following sections of the Mississippi Code of 1972:

Section 97-5-21, Mississippi Code of 1972, relating to seduction of a child under age eighteen (18);

Section 97-5-23, Mississippi Code of 1972, relating to the touching of a child for lustful purposes;

Section 97-5-35, Mississippi Code of 1972, relating to the exploitation of children;

Section 97-5-39, Mississippi Code of 1972, relating to contributing to the neglect or delinquency of a child and felonious battery of a child;

Section 97-5-41, Mississippi Code of 1972, relating to the carnal knowledge of a stepchild, adopted child or child of a cohabitating partner;

Section 97-3-95, Mississippi Code of 1972, relating to sexual battery; or

Section 97-29-59, Mississippi Code of 1972, relating to unnatural intercourse.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 345, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 13-1-403.
Admissibility of child’s out-of-court statements.

An out-of-court statement made by a child under the age of twelve (12) describing any act of child abuse, sexual abuse or any other offense involving an unlawful sexual act, contact, intrusion or penetration performed in the presence of, with, by or on the declarant child, not otherwise admissible, is admissible in evidence to prove the contents thereof, if:

Such statement is made for the purpose of receiving assistance or advice in order to prevent or mitigate the recurrence of the offenses, or in order to obtain advice about the psychological, social or familial consequences associated with the offenses; and

Such statement is made to a person on whom the child should reasonably be able to rely for assistance, counseling or advice; and

The child either:

Is available to testify; or

Is unavailable as a witness, provided that there is other corroborative evidence of the abuse or offense. A finding of unavailability, except in those situations specified by Rule 804 of the Mississippi Rules of Evidence, shall require a finding by the court, based on the specific behavioral indicators described in Section 13-1-411, that the child’s participation in the trial would result in a substantial likelihood of traumatic emotional or mental distress; and

The court finds in a hearing conducted outside the presence of the jury that the time, content and circumstances of the statement provide sufficient guarantees of trustworthiness. In determining the trustworthiness of the statement, the court may consider the age and maturity of the child, the nature and duration of the abuse or offense alleged, factors which may detract from the declarant’s credibility, information provided about the child’s reliability based on the specific behavioral indicators described in Section 13-1-411, or any other factor deemed appropriate.

The defendant shall be notified no later than ten (10) days before trial that an out-of-court statement as described in this section shall be offered in evidence at trial. The notice shall include a written statement of the content of the child’s statement, the time the statement was made, the circumstances surrounding the statement which indicate its reliability and such other particulars as necessary to provide full disclosure of the statement.

The court shall make specific findings of fact, on the record, as to the basis for its ruling under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 345, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 13-1-405.
Use of closed circuit television to show child’s testimony.

Upon motion and hearing in camera, the trial court may order that the testimony of a child under the age of sixteen (16) that an unlawful sexual act, contact, intrusion, penetration or other sexual offense was committed upon him or her, or that he or she witnessed its perpetration upon another child, be taken outside of the courtroom and shown in the courtroom by means of closed circuit television, upon a finding based on specific behavioral indicators described in Section 13-1-411, that there is a substantial likelihood that the child will suffer traumatic emotional or mental distress if compelled to testify in open court.

The motion may be filed by the child, his attorney, parent, legal guardian or guardian ad litem, or any party to the case. The court may also raise the matter on its own motion.

Upon stipulation of the parties, the court may appoint a person who is qualified as an expert and who has dealt with the child in a therapeutic setting concerning the offense to aid in formulating methods of questioning the child and to assist the court in interpreting the answers of the child.

Closed circuit television testimony may be taken by any method not inconsistent with the Mississippi Rules of Civil Procedure and the Mississippi Uniform Criminal Rules of Circuit Court Practice. After a determination that the defendant’s presence would cause a substantial likelihood of traumatic emotional or mental distress to the child, the judge may exclude the defendant from the room where the testimony is taken. In any case in which the defendant is so excluded, arrangements must be made for the defense attorney to be in continual contact with the defendant by any appropriate private electronic or telephonic method throughout the questioning. The defendant and the jury must be able to observe the demeanor of the child witness at all times during the questioning.

The court shall make specific findings of fact, on the record, as to the basis for its rulings under this section.

All parties must be represented by counsel at any taking of any testimony under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 345, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 13-1-407.
Use of child’s videotaped testimony; protective orders; destruction of videotape.

On motion and hearing in camera and a finding based on information placed on the record which was subject to cross-examination:

That there is a substantial likelihood, based on specific behavioral indicators described in Section 13-1-411 exhibited by the child, that a child who is under the age of sixteen (16) would suffer traumatic emotional or mental distress if he were required to testify in open court; or

That such child is otherwise unavailable; a trial court may order the videotaping of the testimony of the victim or witness in a case in which the occurrence or non-occurrence of sexual abuse or child abuse is a material fact, which videotaped testimony is to be utilized at trial in lieu of testimony in open court.

The motion may be made by:

The child, or the attorney, parent, legal guardian or guardian ad litem of the child;

The trial judge acting at his own discretion; or

Any party to the case.

The judge shall preside, or shall appoint a special master to preside, at the videotaping unless the following conditions are met:

The child is represented by a guardian ad litem or counsel;

The child’s representative and the counsel for each party stipulate that the requirement for the presence of the judge or special master may be waived; and

The court finds, after a hearing, that the presence of a judge or special master is not necessary to protect the child.

The defendant and the defendant’s counsel shall be present at the videotaping, unless the defendant has waived this right. Provided, however, that on motion of a party, or of the child’s representative and hearing in camera and a finding based on information placed on the record which was subject to cross-examination that there is a substantial likelihood, based on specific behavioral indicators exhibited by the child, as described in Section 13-1-411, that the child would suffer traumatic emotional or mental distress if he or she were required to testify in the presence of an adult who is alleged to have abused the child, or to have participated in, or concealed such abuse, the court may require that adult, including without limitation a defendant, to view the testimony from outside the presence of the child by means of a two-way mirror or another similar method that will ensure that the defendant can directly observe and hear the testimony of the child, but that the child cannot hear or see the adult. If the defendant is excluded from the room in which testimony is being taken, the defendant and the attorney for the defendant may communicate by any appropriate private electronic or telephonic method.

All questioning shall be done by attorneys for the prosecution and the defense; however, upon stipulation of all parties, the court may appoint a person who is qualified as an expert and who has dealt with the child in a therapeutic setting concerning the offense to aid the court throughout proceedings conducted under this section.

The motion for the taking of videotaped testimony may be made at any time with three (3) days’ written notice of the time and place of the taking of the testimony provided to all parties to the proceeding, to the child and to the child’s representative or guardian.

Any videotape which is made pursuant to this section is subject to a protective order of the court for the purpose of protecting the privacy of the child. The court shall order the destruction of a videotape made pursuant to this section after five (5) years have elapsed since the entry of the judgment in the case in which the videotape was made. However, such order may be made before the expiration of five (5) years upon motion filed by the child, his attorney, parent, legal guardian or guardian ad litem after notice to the defendant. In no event shall such a videotape be destroyed before a final judgment has been rendered on an appeal.

The court shall make specific findings of fact, on the record, as to the basis for its rulings under this section.

All parties must be represented by counsel at any taking of any testimony under this section.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 345, § 4, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 13-1-409.
Expert testimony as to meaning of child’s testimony; appointment of expert.

If scientific, technical or other specialized knowledge will assist the trier of fact in understanding the testimony of a child under the age of twelve (12) in a case in which the occurrence or non-occurrence of physical or sexual abuse of a child is a material issue, a witness qualified as an expert by knowledge, skill, experience, training or education, may testify, based on such expertise, in the form of an opinion or otherwise.

The facts or data in the particular case upon which such an expert bases an opinion or inference may be those perceived by or made known to him at or before the hearing. If of a type reasonably relied upon by experts in the particular field in forming opinions or inferences about the occurrence or non-occurrence of physical or sexual abuse of children, or about children who may be victims or observers of such abuse, the facts or data need not be admissible in evidence.

Testimony in the form of an opinion or inference otherwise admissible is not objectionable because it embraces an ultimate issue to be decided by the trier of fact.

The expert may testify in terms of opinion or inference and give his reasons therefor without prior disclosure of the underlying facts or data, unless the judge requires otherwise. The expert may in any event be required to disclose the underlying facts or data on cross-examination.

The court, in a case where the occurrence or non-occurrence of physical or sexual child abuse is a material issue, may on its own motion or on the motion of any party enter an order to show cause why expert witnesses should not be appointed, and may request the parties to submit nomination. The court may appoint any expert witnesses agreed upon by the parties, and may appoint witnesses of its own selection. An expert witness shall not be appointed by the court unless he consents to act. A witness so appointed shall be informed of his duties by the court in writing, a copy of which shall be filed with the clerk, or at a conference in which the parties shall have opportunity to participate. A witness so appointed shall advise the parties of his findings, if any; his deposition may be taken by any party; and he may be called to testify by the court or any party. He shall be subject to cross-examination by each party, including a party calling him as a witness.

In the exercise of its discretion, the court may authorize disclosure to the jury of the fact that the court appointed the expert witness.

Nothing in this subsection limits the parties in calling expert witnesses of their own selection.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 345, § 5, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 13-1-411.
Behavioral indicators used to determine applicability of evidentiary provisions.

The phrase “specific behavioral indicators” when used herein to refer to evidence (regardless of admissibility) that a child has suffered physical or sexual abuse or might suffer traumatic emotional or mental distress if required to testify in court, shall include, by way of illustration and not of limitation, indications of physical or psychological trauma which are (a) well defined, (b) positively correlated or causally linked with the likelihood of traumatic emotional or mental distress on testifying, and (c) rarely, if at all, present in children who have not suffered child abuse, considering the combination or intensity present in the child at issue.

The evidence described in this section shall be provided by competent witnesses, including but not limited to child psychologists, child psychiatrists and other qualified witnesses.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 345, § 6, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 13-1-413.
Court’s power to prohibit contact with child not affected by evidentiary provisions.

Sections 13-1-401 through 13-1-415 do not in any way affect any court’s power to order any person to refrain from contacting, or being in the presence of, any child.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 345, § 7, eff from and after July 1, 1986.

§ 13-1-415.
Implementation of evidentiary provisions by rule.

The Mississippi Supreme Court may, by rule, provide procedures to implement Sections 13-1-401 through 13-1-415.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1986, ch. 345, § 8, eff from and after July 1, 1986.